Illinois, session 104th, HB5100.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Act 5is amended by changing Section 65 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 708/65)7    Sec. 65. Audit requirements. 8    (a) The standards set forth in Subpart F of 2 CFR Part 200 9and any other standards that apply directly to State or 10federal agencies shall apply to audits of fiscal years 11beginning on or after December 26, 2014.12    (b) Books and records must be available for review or 13audit by appropriate officials of the pass-through entity, and 14the agency, the Auditor General, the Inspector General, 15appropriate officials of the agency, and the federal 16Government Accountability Office.17    (c) The Governor's Office of Management and Budget, with 18the advice and technical assistance of the Illinois Single 19Audit Commission, shall adopt rules that are reasonably 20consistent with 2 CFR Part 200 for audits of grants from a 21State or federal pass-through entity that are not subject to 22the Single Audit Act because (1) the amount of federal awards 23expended during the entity's fiscal year is less than the   HB5100- 2 -LRB104 19355 HLH 32803 b1applicable amount specified in 2 CFR Part 200, Subpart F or (2) 2the subrecipient is an exempt entity as specified in 2 CFR Part 3200, Subpart F.4    (d) This Act does not affect the provisions of the 5Illinois State Auditing Act and does not address the external 6audit function of the Auditor General.7    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 8contrary, all subcontractors and subrecipients who receive 9State grants, whether directly or indirectly, are subject to 10the provisions of this Act, including auditing by the Auditor 11General and the transparency provisions of this Act. 12(Source: P.A. 103-1068, eff. 3-21-25.)